Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 3
REVENUE BONDS

35-65-301. Board may issue revenue bonds.

The board may authorize and issue revenue bonds to finance additional facilities for the board and the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition.

Such revenue bonds shall be authorized and issued only by resolution of the board, which resolution shall conform to the requirements of section 35-65-302. Such bonds may be issued only after approval by both houses of the general assembly either acting by bill or joint resolution and after approval by the governor in accordance with section 39 of article V of the state constitution.

All bonds issued pursuant to the terms of this part 3 shall provide that:

No holder of any such bond may compel the state or any subdivision thereof to exercise its appropriation or taxing power;

The bond does not constitute a debt of the state and is payable from the net revenues from the operation of the additional facilities acquired or provided pursuant to this part 3 and from contributions by nonstate sources for such additional facilities.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 1353, § 1, effective July 14.

L. 83:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1371, § 7, effective June 2.

L. 89:

(3)(b) amended, p. 1413, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(2) and (3)(b) amended, p. 817, § 7, effective June 30.

35-65-302. Resolution.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under the terms of this part 3 shall:

State the date of issuance of the bonds;

State a maturity date or dates during a period not to exceed thirty years from the date of issuance of the bonds;

State the interest rate or rates on, and the denomination or denominations of, the bonds;

State the form of the bond, whether bearer or registered;

State the medium of payment of the bonds and the place where the bonds will be paid.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under the terms of this part 3 may:

State that the bonds are to be issued in one or more series;

State a rank or priority of the bonds;

Provide for redemption of the bonds prior to maturity, with or without premium.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 1354, § 1, effective July 14.

35-65-303. Sale of bonds.

Any bonds issued pursuant to the terms of this part 3 may be sold at public or private sale.

If bonds are to be sold at a public sale, the board shall advertise the sale in such manner as the board deems appropriate.

Each bond issued pursuant to the terms of this section shall be sold at the price, in the manner, and at such time as the board shall designate. The board may pay any fees, expenses, or commissions which it deems necessary or desirable to accomplish the sale of said bonds. The authority to fix the date of sale of the bonds, to receive bids or proposals, to award and sell bonds, to fix interest rates, and to take all other actions necessary to sell and deliver bonds may be delegated to an officer or agent of the authority.

Pending preparation of the actual bonds, interim receipts or certificates may be issued to the purchaser of the bonds in such form and containing such provisions as the board deems appropriate.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 1354, § 1, effective July 14.

L. 83:

(4) amended, p. 1371, § 8, effective June 2.

L. 89:

(3) amended, p. 1413, § 5, effective July 1.

35-65-304. Negotiability.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the law to the contrary, all bonds issued pursuant to this part 3 are negotiable.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 1354, § 1, effective July 14.

35-65-305. Power to secure bonds.

The board, in connection with the issuance of bonds and in order to secure the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon, has the power, by resolution:

To provide that the bonds issued under this part 3 shall be payable from and may be secured by a pledge of and lien on any or all net revenues derived from, and shall be payable from:

Fees, rentals, and other charges for the use of the additional facilities acquired or provided with the proceeds of said bonds or any one or more additional facilities acquired or provided with proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to this part 3; and

Contributions from nonstate sources for such facility or facilities;

To covenant with or for the benefit of the holders of bonds issued under this part 3 that, so long as any of the bonds remain outstanding and unpaid, the board shall prescribe service charges, fees, and rentals and shall revise the same when necessary so that the additional facility or facilities for which the bonds are issued shall always remain self-supporting, with revenues, including donations from nonstate sources for such additional facility or facilities, sufficient:

To provide for all expenses of operation, maintenance, expansion, and replacement of any facilities from which such revenues are derived;

To pay, when due, all bonds and interest thereon; and

To provide reasonable reserves for such purposes.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 1354, § 1, effective July 14.

L. 83:

IP(1) and IP(1)(b) amended, p. 1372, § 9, effective June 2.

L. 89:

(1)(a), IP(1)(b), and (1)(b)(I) amended, p. 1413, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 817, § 8, effective June 30.

35-65-306. Provision of bond resolution - covenants.

A resolution pertaining to issuance of bonds under this part 3 may contain covenants as to:

The purpose to which the proceeds of sale of the bonds may be applied and to the use and disposition thereof;

The use and disposition of the revenues of the project for which the bonds are to be issued;

Such matters as are customary in the issuance of revenue bonds including without limitation the issuance and lien position of other or additional bonds, payable from the net revenue received for the operation of the additional facilities acquired or provided pursuant to this part 3 and contributions from nonstate sources for such facilities;

Books of account and the inspection and audit thereof.

Any resolution made pursuant to the terms of this part 3 shall be deemed a contract with the holders of the bonds, and the duties of the board under such resolution shall be enforceable by any appropriate action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 1355, § 1, effective July 14.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 1372, § 10, effective June 2.

L. 89:

(1)(c) R&RE, p. 1414, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(c) amended, p. 818, § 9, effective June 30.

35-65-307. Validity of bonds.

Bonds issued under this part 3 and bearing the signatures of officers in office on the date of the signing thereof shall be valid and binding obligations, notwithstanding that, before the delivery thereof and payment therefor, any or all of the persons whose signatures appear thereon have ceased to be officers of the board.

The validity of the bonds shall not be dependent on or affected by the validity or regularity of any proceedings relating to the construction, acquisition, improvement, reconstruction, or extension of the facilities of the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition financed by the bonds or done in connection therewith.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 1355, § 1, effective July 14.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 1372, § 11, effective June 2.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 818, § 10, effective June 30.

35-65-308. Prior lien of bonds.

Except as otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the bonds, all bonds of the same issue under this part 3 shall have a prior and paramount lien on the net revenues of the additional facilities acquired or provided pursuant to this part 3 for which the bonds have been issued and contributions from nonstate sources for such facilities. The board may provide for preferential security for any bonds, both principal and interest, to be issued under this part 3 to the extent deemed feasible and desirable by such board over any bonds that may be issued thereafter.

Bonds of the same issue or series issued under this part 3 shall be equally and ratably secured, without priority by reason of number, date, sale, execution, or delivery, by a lien on the net revenue pledged in accordance with the terms of the resolution authorizing the bonds.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 1355, § 1, effective July 14.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 1372, § 12, effective June 2.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1414, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 819, § 11, effective June 30.

35-65-309. Board of commissioners of the Colorado state fair authority - bonds. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 1371, § 6, effective June 2.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 819, § 12, effective June 30.

35-65-310. Colorado state fair authority board - bonds.

On June 30, 1997, any bonds issued pursuant to this part 3 shall become an obligation of the Colorado state fair authority to the same extent that they were an obligation of the board of commissioners of the Colorado state fair authority before said date.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 819, § 13, effective June 30.